vendor/wikimedia/langconv/fst/crh-exceptions-save.foma
  {РАЗЪЕЗД} @-> {RAZYEZD} ,,
  {субъект} @-> {subyekt} ,,
  {Субъект} @-> {Subyekt} ,,
  {СУБЪЕКТ} @-> {SUBYEKT} ,,
  {хавъяр} @-> {havyar} ,,
  {Хавъяр} @-> {Havyar} ,,
  {ХАВЪЯР} @-> {HAVYAR} ,,
  {ямъям} @-> {yamyam} ,,
  {Ямъям} @-> {Yamyam} ,,
  {ЯМЪЯМ} @-> {YAMYAM} ,,
  {ящик} @-> {yaşçik} ,,
  {Ящик} @-> {Yaşçik} ,,
  {ЯЩИК} @-> {YAŞÇİK} ,,
  {мещан} @-> {meşçan} ,,
  {Мещан} @-> {Meşçan} ,,
  {МЕЩАН} @-> {MEŞÇAN} ,,
  {акциз} @-> {aktsiz} ,,
  {Акциз} @-> {Aktsiz} ,,
  {АКЦИЗ} @-> {AKTSİZ} ,,
  {ацет} @-> {atset} ,,
  {Ацет} @-> {Atset} ,,
  {АЦЕТ} @-> {ATSET} ,,
  {блиц} @-> {blits} ,,
  {Блиц} @-> {Blits} ,,
  {БЛИЦ} @-> {BLİTS} ,,
  {бруцеллёз} @-> {brutsellöz} ,,
  {Бруцеллёз} @-> {Brutsellöz} ,,
  {БРУЦЕЛЛЁЗ} @-> {BRUTSELLÖZ} ,,
  {доцент} @-> {dotsent} ,,
  {Доцент} @-> {Dotsent} ,,
  {ДОЦЕНТ} @-> {DOTSENT} ,,
  {фармацевт} @-> {farmatsevt} ,,
  {Фармацевт} @-> {Farmatsevt} ,,
  {ФАРМАЦЕВТ} @-> {FARMATSEVT} ,,
  {глицер} @-> {glitser} ,,
  {Глицер} @-> {Glitser} ,,
  {ГЛИЦЕР} @-> {GLİTSER} ,,
  {люцерна} @-> {lütserna} ,,
  {Люцерна} @-> {Lütserna} ,,
  {ЛЮЦЕРНА} @-> {LÜTSERNA} ,,
  {лицей} @-> {litsey} ,,
  {Лицей} @-> {Litsey} ,,
  {ЛИЦЕЙ} @-> {LİTSEY} ,,
  {меццо} @-> {metstso} ,,
  {Меццо} @-> {Metstso} ,,
  {МЕЦЦО} @-> {METSTSO} ,,
  {наци} @-> {natsi} ,,
  {Наци} @-> {Natsi} ,,
  {НАЦИ} @-> {NATSİ} ,,
  {проце} @-> {protse} ,,
  {Проце} @-> {Protse} ,,
  {ПРОЦЕ} @-> {PROTSE} ,,
  {рецеп} @-> {retsep} ,,
  {Рецеп} @-> {Retsep} ,,
  {РЕЦЕП} @-> {RETSEP} ,,
  {реценз} @-> {retsenz} ,,
  {Реценз} @-> {Retsenz} ,,
  {РЕЦЕНЗ} @-> {RETSENZ} ,,
  {теплица} @-> {teplitsa} ,,
  {Теплица} @-> {Teplitsa} ,,
  {ТЕПЛИЦА} @-> {TEPLİTSA} ,,
  {вице} @-> {vitse} ,,
  {Вице} @-> {Vitse} ,,
  {ВИЦЕ} @-> {VİTSE} ,,
  {швейцар} @-> {şveytsar} ,,
  {Швейцар} @-> {Şveytsar} ,,
  {ШВЕЙЦАР} @-> {ŞVEYTSAR} ,,
  {богородиц} @-> {bogorodits} ,,
  {Богородиц} @-> {Bogorodits} ,,
  {БОГОРОДИЦ} @-> {BOGORODİTS} ,,
  {бруцел} @-> {brutsel} ,,
  {Бруцел} @-> {Brutsel} ,,
  {БРУЦЕЛ} @-> {BRUTSEL} ,,
  {дацюк} @-> {datsük} ,,
  {Дацюк} @-> {Datsük} ,,
  {ДАЦЮК} @-> {DATSÜK} ,,
  {доницетти} @-> {donitsetti} ,,
  {Доницетти} @-> {Donitsetti} ,,
  {ДОНИЦЕТТИ} @-> {DONİTSETTİ} ,,
  {драцена} @-> {dratsena} ,,
  {Драцена} @-> {Dratsena} ,,
  {ДРАЦЕНА} @-> {DRATSENA} ,,
  {контрацеп} @-> {kontratsep} ,,
  {Контрацеп} @-> {Kontratsep} ,,
  {КОНТРАЦЕП} @-> {KONTRATSEP} ,,
  {коцюб} @-> {kotsüb} ,,
  {Коцюб} @-> {Kotsüb} ,,
  {КОЦЮБ} @-> {KOTSÜB} ,,
  {меценат} @-> {metsenat} ,,
  {Меценат} @-> {Metsenat} ,,
  {МЕЦЕНАТ} @-> {METSENAT} ,,
  {мицел} @-> {mitsel} ,,
  {Мицел} @-> {Mitsel} ,,
  {МИЦЕЛ} @-> {MİTSEL} ,,
  {моцарт} @-> {motsart} ,,
  {Моцарт} @-> {Motsart} ,,
  {МОЦАРТ} @-> {MOTSART} ,,
  {плац} @-> {plats} ,,
  {Плац} @-> {Plats} ,,
  {ПЛАЦ} @-> {PLATS} ,,
  {плацен} @-> {platsen} ,,
  {Плацен} @-> {Platsen} ,,
  {ПЛАЦЕН} @-> {PLATSEN} ,,
  {прецедент} @-> {pretsedent} ,,
  {Прецедент} @-> {Pretsedent} ,,
  {ПРЕЦЕДЕНТ} @-> {PRETSEDENT} ,,
  {прецес} @-> {pretses} ,,
  {Прецес} @-> {Pretses} ,,
  {ПРЕЦЕС} @-> {PRETSES} ,,
  {прицеп} @-> {pritsep} ,,
  {Прицеп} @-> {Pritsep} ,,
  {ПРИЦЕП} @-> {PRİTSEP} ,,
  {спец} @-> {spets} ,,
  {Спец} @-> {Spets} ,,
  {СПЕЦ} @-> {SPETS} ,,
  {троиц} @-> {troits} ,,
  {Троиц} @-> {Troits} ,,
  {ТРОИЦ} @-> {TROİTS} ,,
  {шприц} @-> {şprits} ,,
  {Шприц} @-> {Şprits} ,,
  {ШПРИЦ} @-> {ŞPRİTS} ,,
  {эпицентр} @-> {epitsentr} ,,
  {Эпицентр} @-> {Epitsentr} ,,
  {ЭПИЦЕНТР} @-> {EPİTSENTR} ,,
  {яценюк} @-> {yatsenük} ,,
  {Яценюк} @-> {Yatsenük} ,,
  {ЯЦЕНЮК} @-> {YATSENÜK} ,,
  {агъартс} @-> {ağarts} ,,
  {Агъартс} @-> {Ağarts} ,,
  {АГЪАРТС} @-> {AĞARTS} ,,
  {агъыртс} @-> {ağırts} ,,
  {Агъыртс} @-> {Ağırts} ,,
  {АГЪЫРТС} @-> {AĞIRTS} ,,
  {бильдиртс} @-> {bildirts} ,,
  {Бильдиртс} @-> {Bildirts} ,,
  {БИЛЬДИРТС} @-> {BİLDİRTS} ,,
  {битсин} @-> {bitsin} ,,
  {Битсин} @-> {Bitsin} ,,
  {БИТСИН} @-> {BİTSİN} ,,
  {буюльтс} @-> {büyülts} ,,
  {Буюльтс} @-> {Büyülts} ,,
  {БУЮЛЬТС} @-> {BÜYÜLTS} ,,
  {буютс} @-> {büyüts} ,,
  {Буютс} @-> {Büyüts} ,,
  {БУЮТС} @-> {BÜYÜTS} ,,
  {гебертс} @-> {geberts} ,,
  {Гебертс} @-> {Geberts} ,,
  {ГЕБЕРТС} @-> {GEBERTS} ,,
  {делиртс} @-> {delirts} ,,
  {Делиртс} @-> {Delirts} ,,
  {ДЕЛИРТС} @-> {DELİRTS} ,,
  {эгрильтс} @-> {egrilts} ,,
  {Эгрильтс} @-> {Egrilts} ,,
  {ЭГРИЛЬТС} @-> {EGRİLTS} ,,
  {эксильтс} @-> {eksilts} ,,
  {Эксильтс} @-> {Eksilts} ,,
  {ЭКСИЛЬТС} @-> {EKSİLTS} ,,
  {эшитс} @-> {eşits} ,,
  {Эшитс} @-> {Eşits} ,,
  {ЭШИТС} @-> {EŞİTS} ,,
  {иритс} @-> {irits} ,,
  {Иритс} @-> {İrits} ,,
  {ИРИТС} @-> {İRİTS} ,,
  {иситс} @-> {isits} ,,
  {Иситс} @-> {İsits} ,,
  {ИСИТС} @-> {İSİTS} ,,
  {ичиртс} @-> {içirts} ,,
  {Ичиртс} @-> {İçirts} ,,
  {ИЧИРТС} @-> {İÇİRTS} ,,
  {кертсин} @-> {kertsin} ,,
  {Кертсин} @-> {Kertsin} ,,
  {КЕРТСИН} @-> {KERTSİN} ,,
  {кенишлетс} @-> {kenişlets} ,,
  {Кенишлетс} @-> {Kenişlets} ,,
  {КЕНИШЛЕТС} @-> {KENİŞLETS} ,,
  {кийсетс} @-> {kiysets} ,,
  {Кийсетс} @-> {Kiysets} ,,
  {КИЙСЕТС} @-> {KİYSETS} ,,
  {копюртс} @-> {köpürts} ,,
  {Копюртс} @-> {Köpürts} ,,
  {КОПЮРТС} @-> {KÖPÜRTS} ,,
  {косьтертс} @-> {kösterts} ,,
  {Косьтертс} @-> {Kösterts} ,,
  {КОСЬТЕРТС} @-> {KÖSTERTS} ,,
  {кучертс} @-> {küçerts} ,,
  {Кучертс} @-> {Küçerts} ,,
  {КУЧЕРТС} @-> {KÜÇERTS} ,,
  {кучюльтс} @-> {küçülts} ,,
  {Кучюльтс} @-> {Küçülts} ,,
  {КУЧЮЛЬТС} @-> {KÜÇÜLTS} ,,
  {пертсин} @-> {pertsin} ,,
  {Пертсин} @-> {Pertsin} ,,
  {ПЕРТСИН} @-> {PERTSİN} ,,
  {къайтс} @-> {qayts} ,,
  {Къайтс} @-> {Qayts} ,,
  {КЪАЙТС} @-> {QAYTS} ,,
  {къутсуз} @-> {qutsuz} ,,
  {Къутсуз} @-> {Qutsuz} ,,
  {КЪУТСУЗ} @-> {QUTSUZ} ,,
  {орьтс} @-> {örts} ,,
  {Орьтс} @-> {Örts} ,,
  {ОРЬТС} @-> {ÖRTS} ,,
  {отьс} @-> {öts} ,,
  {Отьс} @-> {Öts} ,,
  {ОТЬС} @-> {ÖTS} ,,
  {тартс} @-> {tarts} ,,
  {Тартс} @-> {Tarts} ,,
  {ТАРТС} @-> {TARTS} ,,
  {тутсун} @-> {tutsun} ,,
  {Тутсун} @-> {Tutsun} ,,
  {ТУТСУН} @-> {TUTSUN} ,,
  {тюнъюльтс} @-> {tüñülts} ,,
  {Тюнъюльтс} @-> {Tüñülts} ,,
  {ТЮНЪЮЛЬТС} @-> {TÜÑÜLTS} ,,
  {тюртс} @-> {türts} ,,
  {Тюртс} @-> {Türts} ,,
  {ТЮРТС} @-> {TÜRTS} ,,
  {янъартс} @-> {yañarts} ,,
  {Янъартс} @-> {Yañarts} ,,
  {ЯНЪАРТС} @-> {YAÑARTS} ,,
  {ебертс} @-> {yeberts} ,,
  {Ебертс} @-> {Yeberts} ,,
  {ЕБЕРТС} @-> {YEBERTS} ,,
  {ешертс} @-> {yeşerts} ,,
  {Ешертс} @-> {Yeşerts} ,,
  {ЕШЕРТС} @-> {YEŞERTS} ,,
  {йиритс} @-> {yirits} ,,
  {Йиритс} @-> {Yirits} ,,
  {ЙИРИТС} @-> {YİRİTS} ,,
  {бюджет} @-> {bücet} ,,
  {Бюджет} @-> {Bücet} ,,
  {БЮДЖЕТ} @-> {BÜCET} ,,
  {бюллет} @-> {büllet} ,,
  {Бюллет} @-> {Büllet} ,,
  {БЮЛЛЕТ} @-> {BÜLLET} ,,
  {бюро} @-> {büro} ,,
  {Бюро} @-> {Büro} ,,
  {БЮРО} @-> {BÜRO} ,,
  {бюст} @-> {büst} ,,
  {Бюст} @-> {Büst} ,,
  {БЮСТ} @-> {BÜST} ,,
  {диалог} @-> {dialog} ,,
  {Диалог} @-> {Dialog} ,,
  {ДИАЛОГ} @-> {DİALOG} ,,
  {ханымэфенди} @-> {hanımefendi} ,,
  {Ханымэфенди} @-> {Hanımefendi} ,,
  {ХАНЫМЭФЕНДИ} @-> {HANIMEFENDİ} ,,
  {каньон} @-> {kanyon} ,,
  {Каньон} @-> {Kanyon} ,,
  {КАНЬОН} @-> {KANYON} ,,
  {кирил} @-> {kiril} ,,
  {Кирил} @-> {Kiril} ,,
  {КИРИЛ} @-> {KİRİL} ,,
  {кирилл} @-> {kirill} ,,
  {Кирилл} @-> {Kirill} ,,
  {КИРИЛЛ} @-> {KİRİLL} ,,
  {кёрджа} @-> {körca} ,,
  {Кёрджа} @-> {Körca} ,,
  {КЁРДЖА} @-> {KÖRCA} ,,
  {коy} @-> {köy} ,,
  {Коy} @-> {Köy} ,,
  {КОY} @-> {KÖY} ,,
  {кулеръюзь} @-> {küleryüz} ,,
  {Кулеръюзь} @-> {Küleryüz} ,,
  {КУЛЕРЪЮЗЬ} @-> {KÜLERYÜZ} ,,
  {маалле} @-> {маальle} ,,
  {Маалле} @-> {Маальle} ,,
  {МААЛЛЕ} @-> {МААЛЬLE} ,,
  {майор} @-> {mayor} ,,
  {Майор} @-> {Mayor} ,,
  {МАЙОР} @-> {MAYOR} ,,
  {маниал} @-> {manиаль} ,,
  {Маниал} @-> {Manиаль} ,,
  {МАНИАЛ} @-> {MANИАЛЬ} ,,
  {нормала} @-> {нормальa} ,,
  {Нормала} @-> {Нормальa} ,,
  {НОРМАЛА} @-> {НОРМАЛЬA} ,,
  {проект} @-> {proekt} ,,
  {Проект} @-> {Proekt} ,,
  {ПРОЕКТ} @-> {PROEKT} ,,
  {район} @-> {rayon} ,,
  {Район} @-> {Rayon} ,,
  {РАЙОН} @-> {RAYON} ,,
  {сойады} @-> {soyadı} ,,
  {Сойады} @-> {Soyadı} ,,
  {СОЙАДЫ} @-> {SOYADI} ,,
  {спортсмен} @-> {sportsmen} ,,
  {Спортсмен} @-> {Sportsmen} ,,
  {СПОРТСМЕН} @-> {SPORTSMEN} ,,
  {услюп} @-> {üslüp} ,,
  {Услюп} @-> {Üslüp} ,,
  {УСЛЮП} @-> {ÜSLÜP} ,,
  {услюб} @-> {üslüb} ,,
  {Услюб} @-> {Üslüb} ,,
  {УСЛЮБ} @-> {ÜSLÜB} ,,
  {вакъиал} @-> {vaqиаль} ,,
  {Вакъиал} @-> {Vaqиаль} ,,
  {ВАКЪИАЛ} @-> {VAQИАЛЬ} ,,
  {юзйыллыкъ} @-> {yüzyıllıq} ,,
  {Юзйыллыкъ} @-> {Yüzyıllıq} ,,
  {ЮЗЙЫЛЛЫКЪ} @-> {YÜZYILLIQ} ,,
  {койот} @-> {koyot} ,,
  {Койот} @-> {Koyot} ,,
  {КОЙОТ} @-> {KOYOT} ,,
  {адольф} @-> {adolf} ,,
  {Адольф} @-> {Adolf} ,,
  {АДОЛЬФ} @-> {ADOLF} ,,
  {альберт} @-> {albert} ,,
  {Альберт} @-> {Albert} ,,
  {АЛЬБЕРТ} @-> {ALBERT} ,,
  {бешуй} @-> {beşüy} ,,
  {Бешуй} @-> {Beşüy} ,,
  {БЕШУЙ} @-> {BEŞÜY} ,,
  {флотск} @-> {flotsk} ,,
  {Флотск} @-> {Flotsk} ,,
  {ФЛОТСК} @-> {FLOTSK} ,,
  {гайана} @-> {gayana} ,,
  {Гайана} @-> {Gayana} ,,
  {ГАЙАНА} @-> {GAYANA} ,,
  {грэсовский} @-> {gresovskiy} ,,
  {Грэсовский} @-> {Gresovskiy} ,,
  {ГРЭСОВСКИЙ} @-> {GRESOVSKİY} ,,
  {гриц} @-> {grits} ,,
  {Гриц} @-> {Grits} ,,
  {ГРИЦ} @-> {GRİTS} ,,
  {гурджи} @-> {gürci} ,,
  {Гурджи} @-> {Gürci} ,,
  {ГУРДЖИ} @-> {GÜRCİ} ,,
  {игорь} @-> {igor} ,,
  {Игорь} @-> {İgor} ,,
  {ИГОРЬ} @-> {İGOR} ,,
  {ильич} @-> {ilyiç} ,,
  {Ильич} @-> {İlyiç} ,,
  {ИЛЬИЧ} @-> {İLYİÇ} ,,
  {ильин} @-> {ilyin} ,,
  {Ильин} @-> {İlyin} ,,
  {ИЛЬИН} @-> {İLYİN} ,,
  {исмаил} @-> {ismail} ,,
  {Исмаил} @-> {İsmail} ,,
  {ИСМАИЛ} @-> {İSMAİL} ,,
  {киттс} @-> {kitts} ,,
  {Киттс} @-> {Kitts} ,,
  {КИТТС} @-> {KİTTS} ,,
  {комсомольск} @-> {komsomolsk} ,,
  {Комсомольск} @-> {Komsomolsk} ,,
  {КОМСОМОЛЬСК} @-> {KOMSOMOLSK} ,,
  {корьбекулю} @-> {körbekülü} ,,
  {Корьбекулю} @-> {Körbekülü} ,,
  {КОРЬБЕКУЛЮ} @-> {KÖRBEKÜLÜ} ,,
  {куницын} @-> {kunitsın} ,,
  {Куницын} @-> {Kunitsın} ,,
  {КУНИЦЫН} @-> {KUNİTSIN} ,,
  {львив} @-> {lviv} ,,
  {Львив} @-> {Lviv} ,,
  {ЛЬВИВ} @-> {LVİV} ,,
  {львов} @-> {lvov} ,,
  {Львов} @-> {Lvov} ,,
  {ЛЬВОВ} @-> {LVOV} ,,
  {марьино} @-> {maryino} ,,
  {Марьино} @-> {Maryino} ,,
  {МАРЬИНО} @-> {MARYİNO} ,,
  {махульдюр} @-> {mahuldür} ,,
  {Махульдюр} @-> {Mahuldür} ,,
  {МАХУЛЬДЮР} @-> {MAHULDÜR} ,,
  {павел} @-> {pavel} ,,
  {Павел} @-> {Pavel} ,,
  {ПАВЕЛ} @-> {PAVEL} ,,
  {пантикапейон} @-> {pantikapeyon} ,,
  {Пантикапейон} @-> {Pantikapeyon} ,,
  {ПАНТИКАПЕЙОН} @-> {PANTİKAPEYON} ,,
  {къуртсейит} @-> {qurtseyit} ,,
  {Къуртсейит} @-> {Qurtseyit} ,,
  {КЪУРТСЕЙИТ} @-> {QURTSEYİT} ,,
  {къуртсеит} @-> {qurtseit} ,,
  {Къуртсеит} @-> {Qurtseit} ,,
  {КЪУРТСЕИТ} @-> {QURTSEİT} ,,
  {смаил} @-> {smail} ,,
  {Смаил} @-> {Smail} ,,
  {СМАИЛ} @-> {SMAİL} ,,
  {советск} @-> {sovetsk} ,,
  {Советск} @-> {Sovetsk} ,,
  {СОВЕТСК} @-> {SOVETSK} ,,
  {шемьи-заде} @-> {şemi-zade} ,,
  {Шемьи-заде} @-> {Şemi-zade} ,,
  {ШЕМЬИ-ЗАДЕ} @-> {ŞEMİ-ZADE} ,,
  {тсвана} @-> {tsvana} ,,
  {Тсвана} @-> {Tsvana} ,,
  {ТСВАНА} @-> {TSVANA} ,,
  {учьэвли} @-> {üçevli} ,,
  {Учьэвли} @-> {Üçevli} ,,
  {УЧЬЭВЛИ} @-> {ÜÇEVLİ} ,,
  {йохан} @-> {yohan} ,,
  {Йохан} @-> {Yohan} ,,
  {ЙОХАН} @-> {YOHAN} ,,
  {йорк} @-> {york} ,,
  {Йорк} @-> {York} ,,
  {ЙОРК} @-> {YORK} ,,
  {винныця} @-> {vinnıtsâ} ,,
  {Винныця} @-> {Vinnıtsâ} ,,
  {ВИННЫЦЯ} @-> {VİNNITSÂ} ,,
  {винница} @-> {vinnitsa} ,,
  {Винница} @-> {Vinnitsa} ,,
  {ВИННИЦА} @-> {VİNNİTSA} ,,
  {хмельницк} @-> {hmelnitsk} ,,
  {Хмельницк} @-> {Hmelnitsk} ,,
  {ХМЕЛЬНИЦК} @-> {HMELNİTSK} ,,
  {хмельныцк} @-> {hmelnıtsk} ,,
  {Хмельныцк} @-> {Hmelnıtsk} ,,
  {ХМЕЛЬНЫЦК} @-> {HMELNITSK} ,,
  {зайце} @-> {zaytse} ,,
  {Зайце} @-> {Zaytse} ,,
  {ЗАЙЦЕ} @-> {ZAYTSE} ,,
  {чистеньк} @-> {çistenk} ,,
  {Чистеньк} @-> {Çistenk} ,,
  {ЧИСТЕНЬК} @-> {ÇİSTENK} ,,
  {кольчуг} @-> {kolçug} ,,
  {Кольчуг} @-> {Kolçug} ,,
  {КОЛЬЧУГ} @-> {KOLÇUG} ,,
  {ручьи} @-> {ruçyi} ,,
  {Ручьи} @-> {Ruçyi} ,,
  {РУЧЬИ} @-> {RUÇYİ} ,,
  {ботсвана} @-> {botsvana} ,,
  {Ботсвана} @-> {Botsvana} ,,
  {БОТСВАНА} @-> {BOTSVANA} ,,
  {большой} @-> {bolşoy} ,,
  {Большой} @-> {Bolşoy} ,,
  {БОЛЬШОЙ} @-> {BOLŞOY} ,,
  {большое} @-> {bolşoye} ,,
